test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
      nood+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: nondenigi
      nood+Pron+Pl+Com: nondega
      nood+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: nondegagi
      nood+Pron+Pl+Gen: nonde
      nood+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: nondegi
      nood+Pron+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: nondeks
      nood+Pron+Pl+Tra: nondeks
      nood+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: nondekski
      nood+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: nondekski
      nood+Pron+Pl+Nom: nood
      nood+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: noodki
      omaenese+Pron+Sg+Gen: omaenda
      omaenese+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: omaendagi
      omaenese+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: omaenesegi
      omaenese+Pron+Sg+Gen+Use/Rare: omaenese
      omaenese+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: omaendigi
      omaenese+Pron+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare: omaendi
      omaenese+Pron+Pl+Gen: omaeneste
      omaenese+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: omaenestegi
      sina+Pron+Sg+Nom: sa
      sina+Pron+Sg+Abl+Emph: sinult
      sina+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Emph: sinultki
      sina+Pron+Sg+Ade+Emph: sinul
      sina+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Emph: sinulgi
      sina+Pron+Sg+All+Emph: sinule
      sina+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi+Emph: sinulegi
      sina+Pron+Sg+Ela+Emph: sinust
      sina+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Emph: sinustki
      sina+Pron+Sg+Ine+Emph: sinus
      sina+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Emph: sinuski
      sina+Pron+Sg+Ill+Emph: sinusse
      sina+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Emph: sinussegi
      sina+Pron+Sg+Par: sind
      sina+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: sindki
      sina+Pron+Sg+Abe: sinuta
      sina+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: sinutagi
      sina+Pron+Sg+Ess: sinuna
      sina+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: sinunagi
      sina+Pron+Sg+Trm: sinuni
      sina+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: sinunigi
      sina+Pron+Sg+Tra: sinuks
      sina+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: sinukski
      sina+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi+Emph: sinugi
      sina+Pron+Sg+Gen+Emph: sinu
      sina+Pron+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi+Emph: sinagi
      sina+Pron+Sg+Nom+Emph: sina
      sina+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi+Emph: sinugagi
      sina+Pron+Pl+Com+Emph: sinuga
      sina+Pron+Sg+Abl: sult
      sina+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: sultki
      sina+Pron+Sg+Ade: sul
      sina+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: sulgi
      sina+Pron+Sg+Ela: sust
      sina+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: sustki
      sina+Pron+Sg+Ine: sus
      sina+Pron+Sg+Ill: susse
      sina+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: sussegi
      sina+Pron+Sg+Com: suga
      sina+Pron+Sg+Gen: su
      sina+Pron+Sg+All: sulle
      sina+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: sullegi
      see+Pron+Sg+Par: seda
      see+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: sedagi
      see+Pron+Sg+Tra+Use/Rare: seks
      see+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: sekski
      see+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: selgi
      see+Pron+Sg+Ade+Use/Rare: sel
      see+Pron+Sg+Abl+Use/Rare: selt
      see+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: seltki
      see+Pron+Sg+Ela+Use/Rare: sest
      see+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: sestki
      see+Pron+Sg+Ine+Use/Rare: ses
      see+Pron+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: sesse
      see+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: sessegi
      see+Pron+Sg+Nom: see
      see+Pron+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: seegi
      see+Pron+Sg+Abl: sellelt
      see+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: selleltki
      see+Pron+Sg+Ade: sellel
      see+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: sellelgi
      see+Pron+Sg+All: sellele
      see+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: sellelegi
      see+Pron+Sg+Ela: sellest
      see+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: sellestki
      see+Pron+Sg+Ine: selles
      see+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: selleski
      see+Pron+Sg+Ill: sellesse
      see+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: sellessegi
      see+Pron+Sg+Abe: selleta
      see+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: selletagi
      see+Pron+Sg+Ess: sellena
      see+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: sellenagi
      see+Pron+Sg+Trm: selleni
      see+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: sellenigi
      see+Pron+Sg+Com: sellega
      see+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: sellegagi
      see+Pron+Sg+Gen: selle
      see+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: sellegi
      see+Pron+Sg+Tra: selleks
      see+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: sellekski
      tema+Pron+Sg+Nom: ta
      tema+Pron+Sg+Abl: talt
      tema+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: taltki
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ade: tal
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: talgi
      tema+Pron+Sg+All: tale
      tema+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: talegi
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ela: tast
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: tastki
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ine: tas
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: taski
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ill: tasse
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: tassegi
      tema+Pron+Sg+Gen: ta
      tema+Pron+Sg+Par: teda
      tema+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: tedagi
      tema+Pron+Sg+Abe: temata
      tema+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: tematagi
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ess: temana
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: temanagi
      tema+Pron+Sg+Trm: temani
      tema+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: temanigi
      tema+Pron+Sg+Tra: temaks
      tema+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: temakski
      tema+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi+Emph: temagi
      tema+Pron+Sg+Gen+Emph: tema
      tema+Pron+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi+Emph: temagi
      tema+Pron+Sg+Nom+Emph: tema
      tema+Pron+Sg+Abl+Emph: temalt
      tema+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi+Emph: temaltki
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ade+Emph: temal
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Emph: temalgi
      tema+Pron+Sg+All+Emph: temale
      tema+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi+Emph: temalegi
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ela+Emph: temast
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Emph: temastki
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ine+Emph: temas
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi+Emph: temaski
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ill+Emph: temasse
      tema+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Emph: temassegi
      tema+Pron+Pl+Com: temaga
      tema+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: temagagi
      teie+Pron+Pl+Nom: te
      teie+Pron+Pl+Gen: te
      teie+Pron+Pl+Abl: teilt
      teie+Pron+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: teiltki
      teie+Pron+Pl+Ade: teil
      teie+Pron+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: teilgi
      teie+Pron+Pl+All: teile
      teie+Pron+Pl+All+Foc/gi: teilegi
      teie+Pron+Pl+Ela: teist
      teie+Pron+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: teistki
      teie+Pron+Pl+Ine: teis
      teie+Pron+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: teiski
      teie+Pron+Pl+Ill: teisse
      teie+Pron+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: teissegi
      teie+Pron+Pl+Par: teid
      teie+Pron+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: teidki
      teie+Pron+Pl+Com: teiega
      teie+Pron+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: teiegagi
      teie+Pron+Pl+Abe: teieta
      teie+Pron+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: teietagi
      teie+Pron+Pl+Ess: teiena
      teie+Pron+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: teienagi
      teie+Pron+Pl+Trm: teieni
      teie+Pron+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: teienigi
      teie+Pron+Pl+Tra: teieks
      teie+Pron+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: teiekski
      teie+Pron+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi+Emph: teiegi
      teie+Pron+Pl+Gen+Emph: teie
      teie+Pron+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi+Emph: teiegi
      teie+Pron+Pl+Nom+Emph: teie
      too+Pron+Sg+Par: toda
      too+Pron+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: todagi
      too+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: tolgi
      too+Pron+Sg+Ade+Use/Rare: tol
      too+Pron+Sg+Ela+Use/Rare: tost
      too+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: tostki
      too+Pron+Sg+Ine+Use/Rare: tos
      too+Pron+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: tosse
      too+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: tossegi
      too+Pron+Sg+Abl: tollelt
      too+Pron+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: tolleltki
      too+Pron+Sg+Ade: tollel
      too+Pron+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: tollelgi
      too+Pron+Sg+All: tollele
      too+Pron+Sg+All+Foc/gi: tollelegi
      too+Pron+Sg+Ela: tollest
      too+Pron+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: tollestki
      too+Pron+Sg+Ine: tolles
      too+Pron+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: tolleski
      too+Pron+Sg+Ill: tollesse
      too+Pron+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: tollessegi
      too+Pron+Sg+Abe: tolleta
      too+Pron+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: tolletagi
      too+Pron+Sg+Ess: tollena
      too+Pron+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: tollenagi
      too+Pron+Sg+Trm: tolleni
      too+Pron+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: tollenigi
      too+Pron+Sg+Com: tollega
      too+Pron+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: tollegagi
      too+Pron+Sg+Gen: tolle
      too+Pron+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: tollegi
      too+Pron+Sg+Tra: tolleks
      too+Pron+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: tollekski
      too+Pron+Sg+Nom: too
      too+Pron+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: toogi
